Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-617
Society names and emblems; registration.

Any association, lodge, order, fraternal society, beneficial association, or fraternal and beneficial society or association, historical, military, or veterans organization, labor union, foundation, federation, or any other society, organization or association, degree, branch, subordinate lodge, or auxiliary thereof, whether incorporated or unincorporated, the principles and activities of which are not repugnant to the Constitution and laws of the United States or this state, may register, in the office of the Secretary of State, a facsimile, duplicate or description of its name, badge, motto, button, decoration, charm, emblem, rosette or other insignia, and may, by reregistration alter or cancel the same.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 1, p. 496;

C.S.1929, § 24-614;

R.S.1943, § 21-617.